Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.250

Community corrections officers.

In order to carry out the provisions of this chapter 9.95 RCW the parole officers working under the supervision of the secretary of corrections shall be known as community corrections officers.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 343; 1981 c 136 s 43; 1979 c 141 s 8; 1967 c 134 s 17; 1957 c 227 s 8. Prior: 1939 c 125 s 1, part; RRS s 10249-5f.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.

Severability—1939 c 125: See note following RCW 9.95.200.

Juvenile courts, probation officers: RCW 13.04.040, 13.04.050.